Maryland, session 2026, SB0112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
12–115.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING
CONTROL COMMISSION.
(3) (I) “INTERACTIVE GAME” MEANS A GAME, CONTEST, OR
PROMOTION THAT:
1. IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET OR ACCESSIBLE ON
A MOBILE PHONE, COMPUTER TERMINAL, OR SIMILAR DEVICE;
2. UTILIZES MULTIPLE CURRENCY SYSTEMS OF
PAYMENT ALLOWING THE PLAYER TO EXCHANGE THE CURRENCY FOR ANY PRIZE OR
AWARD OR CASH OR CASH EQUIVALENTS; AND
3. SIMULATES:
A. CASINO–STYLE GAMING, SUCH AS SLOT MACHINES,
VIDEO POKER, AND TABLE GAMES, INCLUDING BLACKJACK, ROULETTE, CRAPS, AND
POKER;
B. LOTTERY GAMES, INCLUDING DRAW GAMES, INSTANT
WIN GAMES, KENO, AND BINGO; OR
C. SPORTS WAGERING.
(II) “INTERACTIVE GAME” DOES NOT INCLUDE A GAME THAT
SOLELY AWARDS NONCASH PRIZES.

SENATE BILL 112 3
(4) “LICENSE” MEANS THE AUTHORITY ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION
TO OFFER OR CONDUCT AN ACTIVITY UNDER TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 1A, 1B, 1D, OR 1E
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT OPERATE, CONDUCT, OR PROMOTE AN
INTERACTIVE GAME IN THE STATE.
(2) AN APPLICANT FOR OR A PERSON HOLDING A LICENSE SHALL
REPORT TO THE COMMISSION ANNUALLY ANY BUSINESS RELATIONSHIP WITH A
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, PAYMENT PROCESSOR, GEOLOCATION PROVIDER, GAMING
CONTENT SUPPLIER, PLATFORM PROVIDER, OR MEDIA AFFILIATE THAT IS KNOWN
TO SUPPORT, OPERATE, CONDUCT, OR PROMOTE AN INTERACTIVE GAME IN THE
STATE.
(C) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A FINE NOT LESS THAN $10,000 AND NOT EXCEEDING
$100,000 OR BOTH.
(2) IF A PERSON IS FOUND IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL DENY THE PERSON’S LICENSE APPLICATION OR REVOKE A
LICENSE HELD BY THE PERSON.
Article – State Government
9–1A–07.
(G) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “ILLEGAL INTERACTIVE GAMING MARKET” MEANS A
JURISDICTION IN WHICH AN INTERACTIVE GAME IS PROHIBITED BY THE LAWS OF
THAT JURISDICTION.
(III) “INTERACTIVE GAME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
12–115 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(2) ON APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND
ANNUALLY FOLLOWING THE ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE, AN APPLICANT OR A
LICENSEE SHALL SUBMIT A DISCLOSURE STATING, FOR THE IMMEDIATE PRECEDING
12–MONTH PERIOD, THE JURISDICTIONS IN WHICH THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE
OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY
ACCEPTED REVENUE FROM THE CONDUCT OF AN INTERACTIVE GAME IN AN ILLEGAL
INTERACTIVE GAMING MARKET.

SENATE BILL 112
(3) A MATERIAL MISREPRESENTATION OR OMISSION ON THE
DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE THE
BASIS FOR THE COMMISSION TO DENY AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE OR, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1A–25 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IMPOSE
SANCTIONS ON A LICENSEE AND THE LICENSEE’S OFFICERS AND BOARD MEMBERS.
[(g)] (H) (1) [An individual] A PERSON may not knowingly give false
information or make a material misstatement in an application required for any license
under this subtitle or in any supplemental information required by the Commission.
(2) [An individual] A PERSON who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a fine
not exceeding $5,000 or both.
9–1A–08.1.
(A) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO A PERSON REQUIRED
TO BE LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF THE APPLICANT OR ANY OF THE
APPLICANT’S AFFILIATES, INCLUDING AN ENTITY UNDER COMMON CONTROL,
KNOWINGLY ACCEPTS REVENUE THAT IS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY DERIVED FROM:
(1) A HIGH–RISK JURISDICTION SUBJECT TO A CALL FOR ACTION BY
THE FINANCIAL ACTION TASK FORCE;
(2) A JURISDICTION DESIGNATED AS A STATE SPONSOR OF
TERRORISM BY THE UNITED STATES; OR
(3) A JURISDICTION IN WHICH ONLINE CASINO GAMING IS
PROHIBITED AND THE REVENUE IS DERIVED FROM ONLINE CASINO GAMING IN THAT
JURISDICTION.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ALLOW A PERSON REQUIRED TO BE
LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO COMMENCE OR CONTINUE OPERATIONS IF THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE PERSON OR ANY OF THE PERSON’S
AFFILIATES, INCLUDING ENTITIES UNDER COMMON CONTROL, KNOWINGLY
ACCEPTS REVENUE THAT IS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY DERIVED FROM A
JURISDICTION DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY REVOKE THE LICENSE OF A LICENSEE
THAT IS REQUIRED TO CEASE OPERATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF, AFTER NOTICE AND OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT IT WOULD FURTHER THE PUBLIC INTEREST TO
DISCONTINUE THE OPERATION OF THE LICENSEE IN THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 112 5
9–1E–03.
(a) (1) Unless the context requires otherwise, the requirements under §§
9–1A–04, 9–1A–06, 9–1A–07, 9–1A–08, 9–1A–08.1, 9–1A–12, 9–1A–14, 9–1A–18,
9–1A–19, 9–1A–20, and 9–1A–25 of this title apply to the authority, duties, and
responsibilities of the Commission, a sports wagering licensee, and an employee or a
contractor of a sports wagering licensee under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.